Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0901.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. As used in this act: (a) "Covered materials" means cement, concrete, or steel. (b) "Covered project" means an infrastructure, transportation, housing, school, or public facility project that receives money from this state. (c) "Department" means the department of technology, management, and budget. (d) "State agency" means a department or agency in the executive branch of state government. Sec. 3. Subject to section 5, a person shall not procure covered materials for a covered project unless the covered materials are produced in the United States. Covered materials are considered to have been produced in the United States if all components of the covered materials that were not produced in the United States constitute less than 5% of the total cost of the covered materials. Sec. 5. (1) A state agency may grant a waiver to the requirements of section 3 if the state agency determines that any of the following conditions are met: (a) There are no covered materials available that meet the requirements of section 3. (b) The procurement of covered materials that meet the requirements of section 3 would increase the cost of the covered project by more than 25%. (c) An emergency exists that requires the immediate procurement of covered materials for a covered project and covered materials that meet the requirements of section 3 cannot be procured immediately. (2) Not later than 30 days after a state agency grants a waiver under subsection (1), the state agency shall publish a copy of the waiver on its website. (3) The department shall provide guidance to all procurement officials in the executive branch of state government and update the department's procurement policies to include a bid preference for projects that commit to using products manufactured in this state. Sec. 7. (1) If another law applies to the procurement of covered materials for a covered project, and if this act conflicts with that law, this act applies to the procurement of the covered materials to the extent that it does not conflict with that law. (2) This act applies to the procurement of covered materials beginning on January 1, 2030.